New York, session 2025-2026, A10079.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (i) of paragraph (a) of subdivision 5 of 2 section 2590-b of the education law, as amended by chapter 103 of the 3 laws of 2013, is amended to read as follows: 4 (i) nine voting members who shall be parents of students who are or 5 have been at any time enrolled in a bilingual or English as a second 6 language program conducted pursuant to section thirty-two hundred four 7 of this chapter[, some of whom may be parents of students who have been 8 in such a program within the preceding two years], to be selected by 9 parents of students who receive or have at any time received such 10 services pursuant to a representative process developed by the chancel- 11 lor. Such members shall serve a two year term and shall be eligible to 12 continue serving their term following the conclusion of their child's 13 enrollment in a bilingual or English as a second language program; 14 § 2. Subparagraph (iii) of paragraph (a) of subdivision 6 of section 15 2590-b of the education law, as added by chapter 345 of the laws of 16 2009, is amended to read as follows: 17 (iii) one voting member who shall be a parent of a student who is or 18 has been at any time enrolled in a bilingual or English as a second 19 language program conducted in a public high school. Such member shall be 20 appointed by the city-wide council on English language learners, and 21 shall serve a two year term and shall be eligible to continue serving 22 their term following the conclusion of their child's enrollment in a 23 bilingual or English as a second language program; 24 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately, provided, however, that 25 the amendments to section 2590-b of the education law made by sections 26 one and two of this act shall not affect the expiration or repeal of 27 such provisions and shall expire and be deemed repealed therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10424-02-6